Illinois, session 104th, HB508.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Customized Employment for Individuals with 5Disabilities Act is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 97/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Customized Employment for Individuals with Disabilities Act.9(Source: P.A. 101-368, eff. 1-1-20.)